Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
Involuntary Termination

625.050.
Petition.

A petition for involuntary termination of parental rights shall be entitled “In the interest of..., a child.”

The petition shall be filed in the Circuit Court for any of the following counties:

The county in which either parent resides or may be found;

The county in which juvenile court actions, if any, concerning the child have commenced; or

The county in which the child involved resides or is present.

Proceedings for involuntary termination of parental rights may be initiated upon petition by the cabinet, any child-placing agency licensed by the cabinet, any county or Commonwealth’s attorney or parent.

The petition for involuntary termination of parental rights shall be verified and contain the following:

Name and mailing address of each petitioner;

Name, sex, date of birth and place of residence of the child;

Name and address of the living parents of the child;

Name, date of death and cause of death, if known, of any deceased parent;

Name and address of the putative father, if known by the petitioner, of the child if not the same person as the legal father;

Name and address of the person, cabinet or agency having custody of the child;

Name and identity of the person, cabinet or authorized agency to whom custody is sought to be transferred;

Statement that the person, cabinet or agency to whom custody is to be given has facilities available and is willing to receive the custody of the child;

All pertinent information concerning termination or disclaimers of parenthood or voluntary consent to termination;

Information as to the legal status of the child and the court so adjudicating; and

A concise statement of the factual basis for the termination of parental rights.

No petition may be filed under this section prior to five (5) days after the birth of the child.

No petition may be filed to terminate the parental rights of a woman solely because of her use of a nonprescribed controlled substance during pregnancy if she enrolls in and maintains substantial compliance with both a substance abuse treatment or recovery program and a regimen of prenatal care as recommended by her health care practitioner throughout the remaining term of her pregnancy. Upon certified completion of the treatment or recovery program, or six (6) months after giving birth during which time substantial compliance with a substance abuse treatment or recovery program has occurred, whichever is earlier, any records maintained by a court or by the cabinet relating to a positive test for a nonprescribed controlled substance shall be sealed by the court and may not be used in any future criminal prosecution or future petition to terminate the woman’s parental rights.

Any petition filed pursuant to this section shall be fully adjudicated and a final judgment shall be entered by the court within six (6) months of the service of the petition on the parents.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 101, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 70, effective April 10, 1988; 2015 ch. 66, § 20, effective March 25, 2015; 2015 ch. 82, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 159, § 41, effective July 14, 2018.

625.060.
Parties to action — Intervention of foster parent.

In addition to the child, the following shall be the parties in an action for involuntary termination of parental rights:

The petitioner;

The cabinet, if not the petitioner; and

The biological parents, if known and if their rights have not been previously terminated. It shall not be necessary to make the putative father a party if he is exempted by KRS

625.065

.

Any party other than the child who is not the petitioner shall be a respondent.

A foster parent of a child who is currently placed with the foster parent for a minimum of six (6) months may intervene as a matter of right in any action for the involuntary termination of parental rights involving a child who is placed with the foster parent, provided the cabinet has no concerns related to maltreatment of the child while in the foster parent’s care. Such intervention may be made anonymously or in the true name of the foster parent. If proceeding anonymously, the foster parent shall be identified by initials and shall receive service through his or her counsel or, if not represented by counsel, by providing a preferred mailing address to receive notices from the court and other parties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 102, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 71, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 57, § 13, effective March 17, 1998; 2019 ch. 132, § 5, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 14, § 1, effective March 16, 2020; 2021 ch. 180, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

625.065.
Putative father party to proceedings.

The putative father of a child shall be made a party and brought before the circuit court in the same manner as any other party to an involuntary termination action if one (1) of the following conditions exists:

He is known and voluntarily identified by the mother by affidavit;

He has registered with the cabinet pursuant to KRS

199.503

as a putative father prior to the birth of the child, or if he did not have notice prior to the birth of the child, within twenty-one (21) days after the birth of the child;

He has caused his name to be affixed to the birth certificate of the child;

He has commenced a judicial proceeding claiming parental right;

He has contributed financially to the support of the child, either by paying the medical or hospital bills associated with the birth of the child or financially contributing to the child’s support; or

He has married the mother of the child or has lived openly or is living openly with the child or the person designated on the birth certificate as the biological mother of the child.

Any person to whom none of the above conditions apply shall be deemed to have no parental rights to the child in question.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 72, effective April 10, 1988; 2018 ch. 159, § 34, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 33, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 266.00.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.4.

625.070.
Service of process — Copy of petition to foster parent.

In any action for involuntary termination of parental rights, service upon the parties shall be accomplished by personal service where possible or constructive service where personal service is not possible, pursuant to the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.

No service shall be necessary if a disclaimer of paternity or a petition for voluntary termination of parental rights has been executed by a parent or alleged parent and filed in the record, or an order terminating parental rights has been entered by a Circuit Court of competent jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure, appointment of a guardian ad litem for a child in an action for termination of parental rights, and service of the petition upon the guardian ad litem shall be sufficient for personal jurisdiction over the child in the action.

Within five (5) days of filing a petition for involuntary termination of parental rights, the petitioner shall send a courtesy copy of the petition to the foster parent, if the child is currently placed with a foster parent, by certified mail or hand delivery. Upon request of the court, the petitioner shall provide documentation of sending through either a copy of a signed mailing receipt or an affidavit verified by the foster parent. If the foster parent’s name and address are unknown to the petitioner, then the courtesy copy shall be served on the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, who shall cause it to be delivered in any manner provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure to the foster parent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 103, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 73, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 57, § 14, effective March 17, 1998; 2020 ch. 14, § 2, effective March 16, 2020.

625.080.
Conduct of hearings.

In any involuntary action for termination of parental rights:

The Circuit Court shall conduct a private hearing. An official stenographic or mechanical record shall be made of the proceedings and retained for a period of five (5) years. The court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law, which may be made on the record, to support its judgment;

Any child to whom an involuntary action directly relates shall be made a party to the action and a guardian ad litem shall be appointed to represent the best interests of the child. The person appointed as a guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), to be paid by the Finance and Administration Cabinet when the cabinet is the proposed custodian. When the cabinet is not the proposed custodian, the court may order the cost to be paid by the proposed adoptive parent, parents, agency, or the petitioner. Upon motion of any party, the child may be permitted to be present during the proceedings and to testify if the court finds such to be in the best interests of the child. In its discretion, the Circuit Court may interview the child in private, but a record of the interview shall be made, which, in the discretion of the court, may be sealed to be used only by an appellate court;

The parents have the right to legal representation in involuntary termination actions. The Circuit Court shall determine if the parent is indigent and, therefore, entitled to counsel pursuant to KRS Chapter 31. If the Circuit Court so finds, the Circuit Court shall inform the parent; and, upon request, if it appears reasonably necessary in the interest of justice, the Circuit Court shall appoint an attorney to represent the parent pursuant to KRS Chapter 31 to be provided or paid for by the Finance and Administration Cabinet a fee to be set by the court and not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

If the parent is currently authorized to visit with the child, the court may continue to permit the parent to visit the child pending the final hearing unless it finds that visitation would not be in the best interest of the child.

The hearing under this chapter shall be held within sixty (60) days of the motion by a party or the guardian ad litem for a trial date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 423, § 104, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 74, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 57, § 15, effective March 17, 1998.

625.090.
Grounds for involuntary termination of parental rights.

The Circuit Court may involuntarily terminate all parental rights of a parent of a named child, if the Circuit Court finds from the pleadings and by clear and convincing evidence that:

The child has been adjudged to be an abused or neglected child, as defined in KRS 600.020(1), by a court of competent jurisdiction;

The child is found to be an abused or neglected child, as defined in KRS 600.020(1), by the Circuit Court in this proceeding;

The child is found to have been diagnosed with neonatal abstinence syndrome at the time of birth, unless his or her birth mother:

Was prescribed and properly using medication for a legitimate medical condition as directed by a health care practitioner that may have led to the neonatal abstinence syndrome;

Is currently, or within ninety (90) days after the birth, enrolled in and maintaining substantial compliance with both a substance abuse treatment or recovery program and a regimen of prenatal care or postnatal care as recommended by her health care practitioner throughout the remaining term of her pregnancy or the appropriate time after her pregnancy; or

In the absence of a prescription for the treatment of a legitimate medical condition, agrees, prior to discharge from the hospital, to participate in a court-ordered assessment by a drug treatment provider and the assigning of a certified peer support specialist for referral to appropriate treatment, and agrees to participate in treatment which shall commence within ninety (90) days after the birth; or

The parent has been convicted of a criminal charge relating to the physical or sexual abuse or neglect of any child and that physical or sexual abuse, neglect, or emotional injury to the child named in the present termination action is likely to occur if the parental rights are not terminated;

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services has filed a petition with the court pursuant to KRS

620.180

or

625.050

; or

A child-placing agency licensed by the cabinet, any county or Commonwealth’s attorney, or a parent has filed a petition with the court under KRS

625.050

; and

Termination would be in the best interest of the child.

No termination of parental rights shall be ordered unless the Circuit Court also finds by clear and convincing evidence the existence of one (1) or more of the following grounds:

That the parent has abandoned the child for a period of not less than ninety (90) days;

That the parent has inflicted or allowed to be inflicted upon the child, by other than accidental means, serious physical injury;

That the parent has continuously or repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be inflicted upon the child, by other than accidental means, physical injury or emotional harm;

That the parent has been convicted of a felony that involved the infliction of serious physical injury to any child;

That the parent, for a period of not less than six (6) months, has continuously or repeatedly failed or refused to provide or has been substantially incapable of providing essential parental care and protection for the child and that there is no reasonable expectation of improvement in parental care and protection, considering the age of the child;

That the parent has caused or allowed the child to be sexually abused or exploited;

That the parent, for reasons other than poverty alone, has continuously or repeatedly failed to provide or is incapable of providing essential food, clothing, shelter, medical care, or education reasonably necessary and available for the child’s well-being and that there is no reasonable expectation of significant improvement in the parent’s conduct in the immediately foreseeable future, considering the age of the child;

That:

The parent’s parental rights to another child have been involuntarily terminated;

The child named in the present termination action was born subsequent to or during the pendency of the previous termination; and

The conditions or factors which were the basis for the previous termination finding have not been corrected;

That the parent has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of having caused or contributed to the death of another child as a result of physical or sexual abuse or neglect;

That the child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the cabinet for fifteen (15) cumulative months out of forty-eight (48) months preceding the filing of the petition to terminate parental rights; or

That the child has been removed from the biological or legal parents more than two (2) times in a twenty-four (24) month period by the cabinet or a court.

In determining the best interest of the child and the existence of a ground for termination, the Circuit Court shall consider the following factors:

Mental illness as defined by KRS 202A.011(9), or an intellectual disability as defined by KRS 202B.010(9) of the parent as certified by a qualified mental health professional, which renders the parent consistently unable to care for the immediate and ongoing physical or psychological needs of the child for extended periods of time;

Acts of abuse or neglect as defined in KRS 600.020(1) toward any child in the family;

If the child has been placed with the cabinet, whether the cabinet has, prior to the filing of the petition made reasonable efforts as defined in KRS

620.020

to reunite the child with the parents unless one or more of the circumstances enumerated in KRS

610.127

for not requiring reasonable efforts have been substantiated in a written finding by the District Court;

The efforts and adjustments the parent has made in his circumstances, conduct, or conditions to make it in the child’s best interest to return him to his home within a reasonable period of time, considering the age of the child;

The physical, emotional, and mental health of the child and the prospects for the improvement of the child’s welfare if termination is ordered; and

The payment or the failure to pay a reasonable portion of substitute physical care and maintenance if financially able to do so.

If the child has been placed with the cabinet, the parent may present testimony concerning the reunification services offered by the cabinet and whether additional services would be likely to bring about lasting parental adjustment enabling a return of the child to the parent.

If the parent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the child will not continue to be an abused or neglected child as defined in KRS 600.020(1) if returned to the parent the court in its discretion may determine not to terminate parental rights.

Upon the conclusion of proof and argument of counsel, the Circuit Court shall enter findings of fact, conclusions of law, and a decision as to each parent-respondent within thirty (30) days either:

Terminating the right of the parent; or

Dismissing the petition and stating whether the child shall be returned to the parent or shall remain in the custody of the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 105, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 75, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 242, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 57, § 16, effective March 17, 1998; 2000, ch. 60, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 146, § 141, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 159, § 26, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 132, § 6, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 230, § 15, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 223, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 223 and 230, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

625.100.
Termination orders.

If the Circuit Court determines that parental rights are to be terminated involuntarily in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall enter an order that the termination of parental rights and the transfer of custody are in the best interest of the child, and that each petitioner is fully aware of the purpose of the proceedings and the consequences of the provisions of this chapter. The order shall terminate all parental rights and obligations of such parent and release the child from all legal obligations to such parent and vest care and custody of the child in such person, agency, or cabinet as the court believes best qualified.

Upon consent by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the child may be declared a ward of the state and custody vested in the cabinet or in any child-placing agency or child-caring facility licensed by the cabinet or in another person, if all persons with parental rights to the child under the law have had their rights terminated voluntarily or involuntarily. If the other person is unrelated to the child, a grant of custody shall be made only with the written approval of the secretary or his designee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 106, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 76, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 426, § 622, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 671, effective June 20, 2005.

625.104.
Child’s right to inherit following termination.

Following the entry of an order involuntarily terminating parental rights in a child, the child shall retain the right to inherit from his parent under the laws of descent and distribution until the child is adopted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 77, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.4.

625.108.
Confidentiality and sealing of files and records.

Any order resulting from the involuntary termination of parental rights of any person under the provisions of this chapter, including the caption of the order, shall contain only the name of the child, without any reference to the names of the parents whose rights have been terminated. Such order shall be duly recorded in the order book of the Circuit Court and a certified copy of the order given to the petitioner and to the cabinet upon request if the cabinet is not a petitioner. Such order may contain a statement of authority to place the child for adoption.

The files and records of the circuit court, excluding the name or other identifying information of a prospective adoptive parent, during proceedings for involuntary termination of parental rights shall not be open to inspection by persons other than parties to such proceedings, their attorneys, and representatives of the cabinet except under order of the court expressly permitting inspection. Upon the entry of the final order in the case, the clerk shall place all papers and records in the case in a suitable envelope which shall be sealed and shall not be open for inspection by any person other than representatives of the cabinet without a written order of the court or as authorized by the provisions of KRS Chapter 199.

No person having charge of any involuntary termination records shall disclose the names of any parties appearing in such records or furnish any copy of any such records, except upon order of the court which entered the judgment of termination; however, facts necessary in order to secure a court order for a copy of the termination order to be used in an adoption proceeding may be disclosed. The clerk of the Circuit Court shall set up a separate docket and order book for termination cases and these files and records shall be kept locked.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 78, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Closed Courtrooms and the Public’s Right of Access, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order and Judgment Voluntarily (Mother) Termination of Parental Rights and Involuntary Termination (Absent Father) of Parental Rights, Form 266.19.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 266.00.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.4.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Adoption and Termination of Parental Rights, Form 3.6.

625.110.
Appeals.

Any order for the involuntary termination of parental rights shall be conclusive and binding on all parties, except that an appeal may be taken from a judgment or order of the Circuit Court involuntarily terminating parental rights in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure. Only an appeal made within thirty (30) days may be considered by the court. The court shall make its final ruling within ninety (90) days after the appeal case is submitted to the appellate bench for decision.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 107, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 79, effective April 10, 1988; 2018 ch. 159, § 27, effective July 14, 2018.

625.120.
Regulations.

The cabinet shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 108, effective July 1, 1987.